Hawaii statutes.
[§196D-7] Streamlining activities. In
administering the consolidated permit application and review process, the
department shall:

(1) Monitor all permit applications submitted under
this chapter and the processing thereof on an ongoing basis to determine the
source of any inefficiencies, delays, and duplications encountered and the
status of all permits in process;

(2) Adopt and implement needed streamlining measures
identified by the interagency group, in consultation with those agencies whose
permitting functions are not transferred by section 196D-10 to the department
for the purposes of the project and with members of the public;

(3) Design, in addition to the consolidated permit
application form, other applications, checklists, and forms essential to the
implementation of the consolidated permit application and review process;

(4) Recommend to the legislature, as appropriate,
suggested changes to existing laws to eliminate any duplicative or redundant
permit requirements;

(5) Coordinate with agencies to ensure that all
standards used in any agency decisionmaking for any required permits are clear,
explicit, and precise; and

(6) Incorporate, where possible, rebuttable
presumptions based upon requirements met for permits issued previously under
the consolidated permit application and review process. [L 1988, c 301, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next